Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1106.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definitions of "project facility" and "qualified taxpayer" in section 1711-L of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, are amended to read:Section 1711-L. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subarticle shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *1234567891011121314151617181920212223 "Project facility." A facility located in this Commonwealth which:(1) manufactures petrochemicals or fertilizers using dry natural gas and which required a capital investment of at least $400,000,000 to construct and place into service[.]; or(2) generates and adds power to an electrical grid by being interconnected to a regional transmission system and contributing to this Commonwealth's energy grid capacity in compliance with the interconnection or applicable regional grid operator standards."Qualified taxpayer." A company that satisfies all of the following:(1) Purchases and uses dry natural gas produced in this Commonwealth in the manufacture of petrochemicals or fertilizers, or in power generation for delivery to the electrical grid for the benefit of rate-regulated, end-use customers, at a project facility in this Commonwealth that has been placed in service on or after the effective date of this section.(2) Has made a capital investment of at least $400,000,000 in order to construct the project facility and place the project facility into service in this Commonwealth.(3) Has created a minimum aggregate total of 800 new jobs and permanent jobs.(4) Has made good faith efforts to recruit and employ, and to encourage any contractors or subcontractors to recruit and employ, workers from the local labor market for employment during the construction of the project facility.(5) Has demonstrated that the new jobs created at the project facility or for work covered by Subarticle F are paid 20250SB1106PN1341 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 at least the prevailing minimum wage and benefit rates for each craft or classification as determined by the Department of Labor and Industry.(6) The construction work to place a project facility into service shall be performed subject to the act of March 3, 1978 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Steel Products Procurement Act.* * *Section 2. Sections 1722-L and 1723-L of the act are amended to read:Section 1722-L. Applicability.This subarticle shall apply to the purchase of dry natural gas produced in this Commonwealth for the period beginning January 1, [2024] 2027, and ending December 31, [2049] 2052.Section 1723-L. Expiration.This subarticle shall expire December 31, [2050] 2052.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB1106PN1341 - 3 - 1234567891011121314151617